Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1710
New or altered roads; plats; records; duties of county board.

After a new road has been established or an existing road altered, the county board shall cause the plat of such road to be recorded and platted in the road plat record of the county with a proper reference to the files in the office of the county clerk where the papers relating to the same may be found.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. IV, § 10, p. 544.